Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.060

Cultural access program—Advisory councils.

Each county creating a program under this chapter may establish an advisory council, the membership of which must include citizen representatives of constituencies and organizations with interests relevant to the work of the program including, but not limited to, leaders in the business, educational, and cultural communities. Advisory council members should be residents of the county creating the program. Policies concerning the size and operation of any advisory council must be established by the county that creates the program.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 304.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.